sk-SK: Určené použitie sladu: Varenie piva; Varenie piva a destilácia; Destilácia; Iné
sl-SI: Namen uporabe slada: Pivovarstvo; Pivovarstvo in destilacija; Destilacija; Drugo
vi: Mục đích sử dụng của mạch nha: Ủ bia; Ủ bia và chưng cất; Chưng cất; Khác
cs: Účel použití sladu: Pivovarnictví; Pivovarnictví a lihovarnictví; Lihovarnictví; Jiné
pl: Przeznaczenie słodu: Warzenie piwa; Warzenie piwa i gorzelnictwo; Gorzelnictwo; Inne
tr: Malt kullanım amacı: Bira yapımı; Bira yapımı ve damıtma; Damıtma; Diğer
sv: Avsedd användning för malt: Bryggning; Bryggning och destillering; Destillering; Annat
pt-BR: Uso pretendido do malte: Fabricação de cerveja; Fabricação de cerveja e destilação; Destilação; Outro
ja: モルト使用目的: 醸造用; 醸造・蒸留用; 蒸留用; その他
en: Malt intended use: Brewing; Brewing and distilling; Distilling; Other
lt-LT: Numatytoji salyklo paskirtis: Aludarystė; Aludarystė ir distiliavimas; Distiliavimas; Kita
el: Προοριζόμενη χρήση βύνης: Ζυθοποιία; Ζυθοποιία και απόσταξη; Απόσταξη; Άλλο
bg-BG: Предназначение на малца: Пивоварство; Пивоварство и дестилация; Дестилация; Друго
fi: Maltaan käyttötarkoitus: Oluenpano; Oluenpano ja tislaus; Tislaus; Muu
pt-PT: Finalidade do malte: Fabrico de cerveja; Fabrico de cerveja e destilação; Destilação; Outro
nl: Beoogd gebruik mout: Brouwen; Brouwen en distilleren; Distilleren; Anders
es: Uso previsto de la malta: Elaboración de cerveza; Elaboración de cerveza y destilación; Destilación; Otro
de: Einsatzzweck für das Malz: Brauen; Brauen und Destillieren; Destillieren; Sonstige
ru: Назначение солода: Пивоварение; Пивоварение и дистилляция; Дистилляция; Другое
fr: Utilisation prévue du malt: Brassage; Brassage et distillation; Distillation; Autre
da: Tilsigtet anvendelse for malt: Brygning; Brygning og destillering; Destillering; Andet
it: Uso previsto del malto: Birrificazione; Birrificazione e distillazione; Distillazione; Altro
zh-CN: 麦芽预期用途: 酿酒; 酿造与蒸馏; 蒸馏; 其他
hu: Maláta rendeltetésszerű felhasználása: Sörfőzés; Sör- és párlatfőzés; Párlatfőzés; Egyéb
hr-HR: Namjena slada: Pivarstvo; Pivarstvo i destilacija; Destilacija; Ostalo
zh-TW: 麥芽預期用途: 釀造; 釀造與蒸餾; 蒸餾; 其他
th: วัตถุประสงค์การใช้งานของมอลต์: หมักเบียร์; หมักเบียร์และกลั่น; กลั่น; อื่นๆ
ko: 몰트 권장 용도: 맥주 양조; 맥주 양조 및 증류; 증류; 기타
ro-RO: Utilizarea prevăzută a malțului: Producerea berii; Producerea berii și distilare; Distilare; Altele
nb: Tiltenkt bruk for malt: Brygging; Brygging og destillering; Destillering; Annet